Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.251

Washington professional educator standards board—Residency certificate renewal for certain experienced teachers and principals—Rules.

By September 1, 2017, the Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules allowing teachers and principals with at least two years of experience, who hold or have held a residency certificate and have not achieved the professional certificate, to renew their residency certificate in five-year intervals based on completion of ten credits or one hundred clock hours as defined in *RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 26 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023 were repealed by 2018 c 266 s 411.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 26: See note following RCW 28A.410.210.